Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.900

Construction—Gender.

Whenever words importing the masculine gender are used in the provisions of this chapter they may be extended to females also as provided in RCW 1.12.050 and whenever words importing the feminine gender are used in the provisions of this chapter they may be extended to males.

[ 1971 c 30 s 8.]